Nebraska, session 109, LB827.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB827 LB827
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 2-3232, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-3232 Each district shall have the power and authority to:
(1) Make studies, investigations, or surveys and do research as may
be necessary to carry out its authorized purposes, enter upon any land,
after notifying the owner or occupier, for the purpose of conducting such
studies, investigations, surveys, and research, and publish and
disseminate the results. Entry upon any property pursuant to this section
shall not be considered trespass, and damages are not recoverable on that
account alone. In case of any actual or demonstrable damage to premises,
the district shall pay the owner of the premises the amount of the
damages. Upon failure of the landowner and the district to agree upon the
amount of damages, the landowner, in addition to any other available
remedy, may file a petition as provided in section 76-705. To avoid
duplication of effort, any such studies, investigations, surveys,
research, or dissemination shall be in cooperation and coordination with
the programs of the University of Nebraska, or any department thereof,
and any other appropriate state agencies; and
(2) Conduct demonstration projects within the district on lands
owned or controlled by this state or any of its agencies, with the
cooperation of the agency administering and having jurisdiction thereof,
and on any other lands within the district, upon obtaining the consent of
the owners of such land or the necessary rights and interest in such
lands, in order to demonstrate by example the means, methods, and
measures by which soil and water resources may be conserved and soil
erosion in the form of soil blowing and soil washing may be prevented and
controlled. Demonstration projects shall be coordinated with the programs
of the Agricultural Research Division of the University of Nebraska
Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources; and .
(3) A natural resources district may establish or participate in
programs to educate residents about or research practices to improve
-2-

LB827 LB827
2026 2026
water quality, water quantity management, or soil health practices. Such
programs may include conducting demonstration projects as provided in
section 2-3232 and hosting educational events to inform agricultural
producers and the general public about practices to protect and preserve
natural resources in the state. A district may enter into agreements with
agricultural producers, nonprofit organizations, companies, service
organizations, political subdivisions, public or private postsecondary
educational institutions, or state or federal agencies to establish or
participate in such programs.
Sec. 2. Original section 2-3232, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-